ru: Тип осцилляции: Регулируемый; Горизонтальный; Без колебаний; Всенаправленный; Вертикальный; Другой
pt-PT: Tipo de oscilação: Ajustável; Horizontal; Não oscilante; Omnidirecional; Vertical; Outro
ro-RO: Tip de oscilație: Reglabil; Orizontal; Neoscilant; Omnidirecțional; Vertical; Altele
zh-CN: 摆动类型: 可调节; 水平; 非摆动式; 全向; 垂直; 其他
ja: 回転タイプ: 調整可能; 横; 非振動; 全指向性; 縦; その他
hu: Lengés típusa: Állítható; Vízszintes; Nem oszcilláló; Minden irányú; Függőleges; Egyéb
pl: Typ oscylacji: Regulowane; Poziome; Nieoscylacyjny; Wielokierunkowe; Pionowe; Pozostałe
nl: Type oscillatie: Verstelbaar; Horizontaal; Niet-oscillerend; Omnidirectioneel; Verticaal; Overig
sk-SK: Typ oscilácie: Nastaviteľná; Horizontálna; Bez oscilácie; Všesmerová; Vertikálna; Iné
es: Tipo de oscilación: Ajustable; Horizontal; No oscilante; Omnidireccional; Vertical; Otros
fi: Oskillointityyppi: Säädettävä; Vaakasuora; Ei-oskilloiva; Monisuuntainen; Pystysuora; Muu
pt-BR: Tipo de oscilação: Ajustável; Horizontal; Não oscilante; Omnidirecional; Vertical; Outro
bg-BG: Тип осцилация: Регулируемо; Хоризонтално; Неосцилиращ; Многопосочно; Вертикално; Друго
da: Svingningstype: Justerbar; Vandret; Ikke-oscillerende; Omnidirektionel; Lodret; Andet
de: Oszillationstyp: Einstellbar; Horizontal; Nicht oszillierend; Omnidirektional; Vertikal; Sonstiges
lt-LT: Osciliacijos tipas: Reguliuojamas; Horizontalus; Nesvyruojantis; Daugiakryptis; Vertikalus; Kita
cs: Typ oscilace: Nastavitelné; Horizontální; Bez oscilace; Všesměrové; Vertikální; Jiné
vi: Loại dao động: Có thể điều chỉnh; Ngang; Không dao động; Đa hướng; Dọc; Khác
el: Τύπος ταλάντωσης: Ρυθμιζόμενο; Οριζόντιο; Μη ταλαντευόμενο; Πολυκατευθυντικό; Κάθετη; Άλλο
ko: 회전 방식: 조절식; 수평; 비회전; 무지향성; 수직; 기타
th: ประเภทการส่าย: แบบปรับได้; แนวนอน; ไม่ส่าย; การรับเสียงแบบออมนิไดเร็คชันแนล; แนวตั้ง; อื่นๆ
nb: Oscillasjonstype: Regulerbar; Horisontal; Ikke-oscillerende; Omnidireksjonell; Vertikal; Annet
sv: Typ av oscillation: Justerbar; Horisontell; Icke-oscillerande; Rundstrålande; Vertikal; Övrigt
sl-SI: Vrsta osciliranja: Prilagodljivo; Vodoravna; Neoscilirajoče; Vsesmerna; Navpična; Druga
fr: Type d’oscillation: Ajustables; Horizontal; Non oscillant; Omnidirectionnel; Vertical; Autre
it: Tipo di oscillazione: Regolabile; Orizzontale; Non oscillante; Omnidirezionale; Verticale; Altro
hr-HR: Vrsta oscilacije: Podesivo; Horizontalno; Bez osciliranja; Svesmjerni; Vertikalno; Ostalo
tr: Salınım tipi: Ayarlanabilir; Yatay; Salınımsız; Her yöne; Dikey; Diğer
en: Oscillation type: Adjustable; Horizontal; Non-oscillating; Omnidirectional; Vertical; Other
zh-TW: 擺動類型: 可調節式; 水平; 非擺動式; 全向式; 垂直; 其他